Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-958
Wayne State College; programs authorized.

Wayne State College may maintain its existing baccalaureate general academic, baccalaureate occupational, and baccalaureate professional degree programs and shall limit new baccalaureate degree programs to the needs of its unique service area generally defined as the state's northeast region. Subject to approval by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, Wayne State College may independently award the master's degree in business administration. Subject to approval by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, Wayne State College may offer other master's degree programs upon demonstration of a compelling need in disciplines in which it has a demonstrated capacity as authorized and approved by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413 and 85-1414.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 42;

Laws 1984, LB 970, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 99.